Utah statutes.
7-1-608.   School or institutional savings plans authorized.

A depository institution may contract with any public or non-public elementary or secondary school or institution of higher learning, or any public or charitable institution caring for minors, for the participation and implementation by the depository institution in any school or institutional savings plan, and it may accept savings accounts at the school or institution, either by its own collector or by any representative of the school or institution which becomes the agent of the depository institution for that purpose.

